Tennessee statutes. Title 42 Aeronautics
Chapter 7

Civil Air Patrol

42-7-101. Tennessee wing, existing for public purposes — Gifts and allotments, authority to receive.

The functions of the Tennessee wing, civil air patrol, and of its various groups and squadrons, are declared to be for public purposes, and the organizations are entitled to receive appropriations, gifts, grants and allotments of moneys, for the carrying out of their several activities that benefit the general public, from the federal treasury, the state treasury, and the treasuries of the cities and counties of the state and from any other source whatsoever.

Acts 1947, ch. 12, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 2726.58 (Williams, § 2726.72); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 42-501.

Cross-References. Board of claims jurisdiction regarding civil air patrol member injuries, §9-8-307.

Fees for special license plates, §55-4-204.

Issuance of special license plates, §55-4-203.

Jurisdiction of Tennessee claims commission, §9-8-307.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Airplanes and Airports, § 1.

42-7-102. Leave of absence with pay — Other rights and benefits.

An employee of this state who is a member of the United States air force auxiliary civil air patrol who participates in a training program for the civil air patrol, or in emergency and disaster services, as defined in § 58-2-101, shall be entitled to a leave of absence with pay for a period of not more than fifteen (15) days during a calendar year for such purposes if the leave of absence is at the request of the employee's wing commander or the wing commander's designated representative.

If an employee is granted a leave of absence pursuant to this section, the employee shall be entitled to the employee's regular salary during the time the employee is away from the employee's regular duties.

Any leave of absence granted pursuant to this section shall be in addition to any other leave of the employee.

All other rights and benefits of the employee, including seniority rights, insurance benefits, health insurance benefits, creditable service, and all other such rights and benefits, shall continue as if a leave of absence had not been granted.

Acts 2008, ch. 992, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2008, ch. 992, § 3. July 1, 2008.